Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.017

Collective bargaining agreements.

Nothing contained in RCW 43.320.011 may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the expiration date of the current agreement or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the Washington personnel resources board as provided by law.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 3; 1993 c 472 s 13.]